Illinois, session 104th, SB3982.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    (625 ILCS 5/3-606 rep.)5    (625 ILCS 5/3-606.1 rep.)6    (625 ILCS 5/3-606.5 rep.)7    (625 ILCS 5/3-610 rep.)8    (625 ILCS 5/3-610.1 rep.)9    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 10repealing Sections 3-606, 3-606.1, 3-606.5, 3-610, and 113-610.1. 12    Section 10. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 13changing Sections 3-405.1 and 3-604 as follows: 14    (625 ILCS 5/3-405.1)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-405.1)15    Sec. 3-405.1. Application for vanity and personalized 16license plates. 17    (a) Vanity license plates mean any license plates, 18assigned to a passenger motor vehicle of the first division, 19to a motor vehicle of the second division registered at not 20more than 8,000 pounds, to a trailer weighing 8,000 pounds or 21less paying the flat weight tax, to a funeral home vehicle, an 22electric vehicle, or a recreational vehicle, which display a   SB3982- 2 -LRB104 19065 LNS 32510 b1registration number containing 1 to 7 letters and no numbers 2or 1, 2, or 3 numbers and no letters as requested by the owner 3of the vehicle and license plates issued to retired members of 4Congress under Section 3-610.1 or to retired members of the 5General Assembly as provided in Section 3-606.1. Personalized 6license plates mean any license plates, assigned to a 7passenger motor vehicle of the first division, to a motor 8vehicle of the second division registered at not more than 98,000 pounds, to a trailer weighing 8,000 pounds or less 10paying the flat weight tax, to a funeral home vehicle, an 11electric vehicle, or a recreational vehicle, which display a 12registration number containing one of the following 13combinations of letters and numbers, as requested by the owner 14of the vehicle: 15    Standard Passenger Plates16    First Division Vehicles 17    1 letter plus 0-9918    2 letters plus 0-9919    3 letters plus 0-9920    4 letters plus 0-9921    5 letters plus 0-9922    6 letters plus 0-9 23    Second Division Vehicles  SB3982- 3 -LRB104 19065 LNS 32510 b1    8,000 pounds or less, Trailers 2    8,000 pounds or less paying the flat3    weight tax, and Recreation Vehicles 4    0-999 plus 1 letter5    0-999 plus 2 letters6    0-999 plus 3 letters7    0-99 plus 4 letters8    0-9 plus 5 letters9    (b) For any registration period commencing after December 1031, 2003, any person who is the registered owner of a passenger 11motor vehicle of the first division, of a motor vehicle of the 12second division registered at not more than 8,000 pounds, of a 13trailer weighing 8,000 pounds or less paying the flat weight 14tax, of a funeral home vehicle, of an electric vehicle, or of a 15recreational vehicle registered with the Secretary of State or 16who makes application for an original registration of such a 17motor vehicle or renewal registration of such a motor vehicle 18may, upon payment of a fee prescribed in Section 3-806.1 or 19Section 3-806.5, apply to the Secretary of State for vanity or 20personalized license plates. 21    (c) Except as otherwise provided in this Chapter 3, vanity 22and personalized license plates as issued under this Section 23shall be the same color and design as other passenger vehicle 24license plates or electric vehicle license plates and shall 25not in any manner conflict with any other existing passenger,   SB3982- 4 -LRB104 19065 LNS 32510 b1commercial, trailer, motorcycle, or special license plate 2series. However, special registration plates issued under 3Sections 3-611 and 3-616 for vehicles operated by or for 4persons with disabilities may also be vanity or personalized 5license plates.6    (d) Vanity and personalized license plates shall be issued 7only to the registered owner of the vehicle on which they are 8to be displayed, except as provided in Sections 3-611 and 93-616 for special registration plates for vehicles operated by 10or for persons with disabilities.11    (e) An applicant for the issuance of vanity or 12personalized license plates or subsequent renewal thereof 13shall file an application in such form and manner and by such 14date as the Secretary of State may, in his discretion, 15require.16    No vanity nor personalized license plates shall be 17approved, manufactured, or distributed that contain any 18characters, symbols other than the international accessibility 19symbol for vehicles operated by or for persons with 20disabilities, foreign words, or letters of punctuation.21    (f) Vanity and personalized license plates as issued 22pursuant to this Act may be subject to the Staggered 23Registration System as prescribed by the Secretary of State.24    (g) For purposes of this Section, "funeral home vehicle" 25means any motor vehicle of the first division or motor vehicle 26of the second division weighing 8,000 pounds or less that is   SB3982- 5 -LRB104 19065 LNS 32510 b1owned or leased by a funeral home. 2    (h) As used in this Section, "electric vehicle" means any 3vehicle that is required to be registered under Section 3-805. 4(Source: P.A. 102-154, eff. 1-1-22.) 5    (625 ILCS 5/3-604)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-604)6    Sec. 3-604. Expiration of special plates. Every special 7plate issued, except those issued for dealers, manufacturers 8and transporters under Section 3-602 and persons with 9disabilities under Section 3-609 or 3-616, or deaf or hard of 10hearing under Section 3-616 of this Code, may be issued for a 112-year 2 year period beginning January 1st of each 12odd-numbered year and ending December 31st of the subsequent 13even-numbered year. The special plates issued to a person with 14disabilities or a person who is deaf or hard of hearing shall 15expire according to the multi-year procedure as established by 16Section 3-414 of this Code.17    Special plates issued to members of the General Assembly 18under Section 3-606 shall expire at midnight on the 31st day of 19January in odd-numbered years.20(Source: P.A. 95-167, eff. 1-1-08; 96-79, eff. 1-1-10.)